Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2492.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1004. Power of Department to Require Insurance.--The department may, as to a child care center, prescribe, by regulation or order, such requirements as it may deem necessary to ensure that a child care center is able to operate for the period under section 1090, including the filing of surety bonds, the carrying of insurance or a requirement to hold financial reserves. A child care center shall hold coverage or reserves in <--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819 such amounts as the department may prescribe, but not less than an amount to cover thirty days of operations, including wages and other operating costs.SECTION 912. NOTIFICATION OF CHILD CARE CLOSURE.--(A) A CHILDREN'S INSTITUTION THAT PROVIDES CHILD CARE THAT INTENDS TO CLOSE OR CEASE ITS OPERATIONS SHALL PROVIDE NOTIFICATION IN WRITING TO THE DEPARTMENT, EMPLOYES AND PARENTS AND GUARDIANS OF CHILDREN IN THE CARE OF THE INSTITUTION NO LESS THAN THIRTY DAYS PRIOR TO THE ANTICIPATED CLOSING. THE NOTICE SHALL INCLUDE A PLAN FOR THE STORAGE AND PRESERVATION OF ALL REQUIRED RECORDS.(B) T HIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY IF THE REASON FOR THE CLOSURE IS A DISASTER EMERGENCY, AS DECLARED BY THE GOVERNOR UNDER SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE IV OF THE CONSTITUTION OF PENNSYLVANIA, OR AN EMERGENCY REMOVAL ACTION ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT.Section 2. Article X of the act is amended by adding a subarticle to read:(e) Miscellaneous ProvisionsSection 1091. Notification of Child Care Closure.--(a) A child care center or family child care home that intends to close or cease its operations shall provide notification in writing to the department, employees and parents and guardians of children in the care of the child care center or family child care home no less than thirty days prior to the anticipated closing. The notice shall include a plan for the storage and preservation of all required records.(b) If a child care center or family child care home violates subsection (a), the child care center or family child care home shall be liable to a parent or guardian of a child in its care for child care expenses or lost wages incurred during 20260HB2492PN3691 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 each day of the violation.(c) (B) This section does not apply if the reason for the closure is a disaster emergency, as declared by the Governor under section 20 of Article IV of the Constitution of Pennsylvania , OR AN EMERGENCY REMOVAL ACTION ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT . Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2492PN3691 - 3 - <--<--1234567